Indiana, session 2026, HB1386.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-31.5-2-195.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 195.6. "Massage establishment",
for purposes of IC 35-45-21-6, has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-45-21-6(a).
SECTION 2. IC 35-45-21-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) As used in this section, "massage
establishment" means a facility where massage therapy is
provided. The term does not include the following:
(1) The office of a licensed health care practitioner (as defined
in IC 20-34-5-4), if the licensed health care practitioner
employs a massage therapist to perform massage therapy on
the patients of the licensed health care practitioner.
(2) A public lodging establishment, if the massage therapy is
provided for persons at the public lodging establishment.
(3) The residence of a massage therapist who provides
2026 IN 1386—LS 6782/DI 107


massage therapy at the massage therapist's residence, if the
massage therapist is the only person providing massage
therapy at the residence.
(b) A person who operates a massage establishment and
knowingly or intentionally employs an individual who:
(1) provides massages; and
(2) does not have professional liability insurance with
minimum coverage of two million dollars ($2,000,000) per
claim and six million dollars ($6,000,000) in aggregate;
commits a Class A misdemeanor.
2026 IN 1386—LS 6782/DI 107